Washington statutes.
RCW 41.35.020

System created—Administration.

A retirement system is hereby created for the employees of school districts or educational service districts. The administration and management of the retirement system, the responsibility for making effective the provisions of this chapter, and the authority to make all rules necessary therefor are hereby vested in the department. All such rules shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW. This retirement system shall be known as the Washington school employees' retirement system.

[ 1998 c 341 s 3.]